Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 10.1-1182.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Environment”
means the natural, scenic, and historic attributes of the Commonwealth.

“Environmental justice”
means the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of every person, regardless of race, color, national origin, faith, disability, or income, in the development, implementation, and enforcement of environmental laws, regulations, and policies.

“Special order”
means an administrative order issued to any party that has a stated duration of not more than twelve months and that may include a civil penalty of not more than $10,000.

History.

1992, c. 887; 1996, c. 1005; 2020, c. 454.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, c. 184, cl. 1 provides: “That no state agency shall consider or include the Little Creek watershed as part of the James River Basin when developing or implementing the Chesapeake Bay Watershed Implementation Plan.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 503, cl. 1 provides:

“§ 1. A. That the Department of Environmental Quality (the Department) is requested to continue its Waste Diversion and Recycling Task Force (the Task Force) that was created pursuant to SJ 42 (2020).

“B. That the Department shall include in the Task Force additional members including (i) two directly affected community members who reside within a reasonable vicinity of a currently permitted and operating landfill; (ii) two experts on solid waste management and recycling at the academic or research level who shall be independent of and not associated with or employed by any public or private waste management entity or any advocacy group; (iii) a member of the Virginia Council on Environmental Justice; (iv) a representative of a rural solid waste planning unit; (v) a representative of an urban solid waste planning unit; (vi) a representative of a rural local government with experience in land-use planning; (vii) a representative of an urban local government with experience in land-use planning; (viii) a representative of the Virginia Trucking Association; and (ix) a representative of an environmental advocacy group focusing on the management and recycling of solid waste. If the Director of the Department determines that certain additional members would contribute to the deliberations of the Task Force, he may allow participation of additional members who shall be nonvoting members and shall not be counted for purposes of a quorum.

“C. That in addition to those topics of study identified in SJ 42 (2020), the Task Force shall (i) further study available options to divert from landfills in the Commonwealth food residuals, organic waste, and baseline recyclables; (ii) conduct a meta-analysis or systematic review of the policies, legislation, practices, and programs proposed and implemented by other states and draw upon such programs in considering recommendations for waste diversion policies; (iii) examine Virginia’s status as a prime destination for out-of-state trash and explore ways in which waste from other states can be diverted from Virginia’s landfills; (iv) assess the landfill, hazardous waste, and recycling facilities needed to manage toxic materials generated by electric vehicle and electric grid backup battery waste; and (v) investigate the role of a composting and food donation infrastructure in reducing the volume of waste that is accepted by landfills, including upgrading and refining existing food donation infrastructure, identifying food material and organic waste generators and haulers, comparing the use of in-house composting with regional composting hubs, studying the ideal distance between composting hubs and waste generators, considering the permitting of composting hubs, and exploring markets and systems for composting services and anaerobic digestion.

“D. That in developing its recommendations, the Task Force shall take guidance from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s Sustainable Materials Management Program Strategic Plan.

“E. That the Task Force shall hold its first meeting of the 2021 interim no later than October 15, 2021, and shall publish an executive summary and a report of its findings and recommendations no later than November 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 454 added the definition for “Environmental justice.”

Law Review.

For note on relations between states and Environmental Protection Agency, see 33 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 590 (1976).

For article discussing issues relating to toxic substances litigation, focusing on the Fourth Circuit, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 247 (1982).

For article as to common-law principles underlying public interests in tidal water resources, see 23 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 835 (1982).

For survey of Virginia environmental law for the year 1989-1990, see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 583 (1990).

For article, “State Environmental Programs: A Study in Political Influence and Regulatory Failure,” see 31 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 823 (1990).

For article addressing significant developments in Virginia law pertaining to air quality, water quality and solid and hazardous waste, between 1990 and 1992, see “Environmental Law,” 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 729 (1992).

Research References.

Environmental Law Practice Guide (Matthew Bender). Gerard.

Environmental Law in Real Estate and Business Transactions (Matthew Bender). Berz, Spracker, Strochak.

§ 10.1-1182.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this chapter the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 10.1-1183.
Creation of Department of Environmental Quality; statement of policy.

There is hereby created a Department of Environmental Quality by the consolidation of the programs, functions, staff, facilities, assets and obligations of the following agencies: the State Water Control Board, the Department of Air Pollution Control, the Department of Waste Management, and the Council on the Environment. Wherever in this title and in the Code of Virginia reference is made to the Department of Air Pollution Control, the Department of Waste Management or the Council on the Environment, or any division thereof, it shall mean the Department of Environmental Quality.

It is the policy of the Department of Environmental Quality to protect and enhance the environment of Virginia in order to promote the health and well-being of the Commonwealth’s citizens, residents, and visitors in accordance with applicable laws and regulations. The purposes of the Department are:

To assist in the effective implementation of the Constitution of Virginia by carrying out state policies aimed at conserving the Commonwealth’s natural resources and protecting its atmosphere, land, and waters from pollution.

To address climate change by developing and implementing policy and regulatory approaches to reducing climate pollution and promoting climate resilience in the Commonwealth and by ensuring that climate impacts and climate resilience are taken into account across all programs and permitting processes.

To coordinate permit review and issuance procedures to protect all aspects of Virginia’s environment.

To further environmental justice and enhance public participation in the regulatory and permitting processes.

To establish and effectively implement a pollution prevention program to reduce the impact of pollutants on Virginia’s natural resources.

To establish procedures for, and undertake, long-range environmental program planning and policy analysis, including assessments of emerging environmental challenges.

To conduct comprehensive evaluations of the Commonwealth’s environmental protection programs.

To develop uniform administrative systems to ensure coherent environmental policies.

To coordinate state reviews with federal agencies on environmental issues, such as environmental impact statements.

To promote environmental quality through public hearings and expeditious and comprehensive permitting, inspection, monitoring, and enforcement programs, and provide effective service delivery to the regulated community.

To advise the Governor and General Assembly, and, on request, assist other officers, employees, and public bodies of the Commonwealth, on matters relating to environmental quality and the effectiveness of actions and programs designed to enhance that quality.

To ensure that there is consistency in the enforcement of the laws, regulations, and policies as they apply to holders of permits or certificates issued by the Department, whether the owners or operators of such regulated facilities are public sector or private sector entities, including the development of electronic recordkeeping and document transmittal systems that encourage the use of electronic methods in performing the Department’s business as a means of furthering both resource conservation and transaction efficiency.

To ensure the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of all people regardless of race, color, national origin, faith, disability, or income with respect to the administration of environmental laws, regulations, and policies.

Wherever the term is used in this chapter or in other statutory or regulatory provisions that the Department administers, (i) “certified mail” means electronically certified or postal certified mail, except that this provision shall apply only to the mailing of plan approvals, permits, or certificates issued under the provisions of this chapter and those of the Air Pollution Control Law (§

10.1-1300

et seq.), the Virginia Waste Management Act (§

10.1-1400

et seq.), and the State Water Control Law (§ 62.1-44.2 et seq.), and only where the recipient has notified the Department of his consent to receive plan approvals, permits, or certificates by electronic mail, and (ii) “mail” means electronic or postal delivery. Any statutory provisions requiring use of “certified mail” to transmit special orders or administrative orders pursuant to enforcement proceedings shall mean postal certified mail.

History.

1992, c. 887; 1999, c. 207; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2013, c. 348; 2020, cc. 454, 492.

The 1999 amendment

added subdivision 12.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 79, are identical, and deleted subsection 7, which read: “To provide increased opportunities for public education programs on environmental issues” and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 348 added the language beginning “including the development” to the end of subdivision 11.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 454, inserted the subsection designations A through C; in subsection B, substituted “is” for “shall be” in the first sentence in the introductory wording; in subdivision B 3, inserted “further environmental justice and”; in subdivision B 11, deleted “To serve that end, wherever” at the end; and in subdivision B 13, inserted “Wherever the term is” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendment by c. 492, in the second paragraph of the introductory language, inserted “and enhance” and added “residents, and visitors in accordance with applicable laws and regulations” in the first sentence; added a new subdivision B 2 and renumbered accordingly; in subdivision B 6, added “including assessments of emerging environmental challenges”; and added subdivision B 13.

Law Review.

For comment on nonpoint pollution control in Virginia, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 539 (1979).

For article as to common-law principles underlying public interests in tidal water resources, see 23 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 835 (1982).

§ 10.1-1184.
State Air Pollution Control Board, State Water Control Board, and Virginia Waste Management Board continued.

The State Air Pollution Control Board, State Water Control Board, and Virginia Waste Management Board are continued and shall promote the environmental quality of the Commonwealth. All policies and regulations adopted or promulgated by the State Air Pollution Control Board, State Water Control Board, Virginia Waste Management Board, and the Council on the Environment and in effect on December 31, 1992, shall continue to be in effect until and unless superseded by new policies or regulations. Representatives of the three Boards shall meet jointly at least twice a year to receive public comment and deliberate about environmental issues of concern to the Commonwealth, including the development and implementation of regulations for multimedia permitting, increased efficiencies for the processing of permit applications and information requests, the enhancement of environmental protection, and opportunities for effective public participation.

History.

1992, c. 887; 2008, cc. 276, 557.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 3 provides: “That regulatory actions necessary to implement the provisions of this act are exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 4 provides: “That State Air Pollution Control Board members appointed before July 1, 2008, shall continue in office for the terms for which appointed. For the two additional members, one member shall be appointed for a term of four years and one member shall be appointed for a term of three years. Thereafter the successors of all members shall be appointed for four-year terms. Prior to July 1, 2010, the two additional members appointed pursuant hereto shall not vote on any action related to a permit for which the State Air Pollution Control Board has exercised its authority for direct consideration as of January 1, 2008.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and added “including the development and implementation of regulations for multimedia permitting, increased efficiencies for the processing of permit applications and information requests, the enhancement of environmental protection, and opportunities for effective public participation” to the end.

§ 10.1-1184.1.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Additional duties of Department; controversial permits.

For purposes of this section, “controversial permit” means an air or water permitting action for which a public hearing has been granted pursuant the provisions of subsection C. “Controversial permit” also means an air permitting action where a public hearing is required for (i) the construction of a new major source or for a major modification to an existing source, (ii) a new fossil fuel-fired generating facility with a capacity of 500 megawatts or more, (iii) a major modification to an existing source that is a fossil fuel-fired generating facility with a capacity of 500 megawatts or more, (iv) a new fossil fuel-fired compressor station facility used to transport natural gas, or (v) a major modification to an existing source that is a fossil fuel-fired compressor station facility used to transport natural gas.

At each regular meeting of the Air Pollution Control Board or the State Water Control Board , the Department shall provide an overview and update regarding any controversial permits pending before the Department that are relevant to each board. Immediately after such presentation by the Department, the board shall have an opportunity to respond to the Department’s presentation and provide commentary regarding such pending permits. Before rendering a final decision on a controversial permit, the Department shall publish a summary of public comments received during the applicable public comment period and public hearing. After such publication, the Department shall publish responses to the public comment summary and hold a public hearing to provide an opportunity for individuals who previously commented, either at a public hearing or in writing during the applicable public comment period, to respond to the Department’s public comment summary and response. No new information shall be accepted at that time.

Any changes to regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section shall include the following criteria for requesting and granting a public hearing on a permit action during a public comment period in those instances where a public hearing is not mandatory under state or federal law or regulation.

During the public comment period on permit action, interested persons may request a public hearing to contest such action or the terms and conditions thereof. Requests for a public hearing shall contain the following information: (i) the name and postal mailing or email address of the requester; (ii) the names and addresses of all persons for whom the requester is acting as a representative (for the purposes of this requirement, “person” includes an unincorporated association); (iii) the reason for the request for a public hearing; (iv) a brief, informal statement setting forth the factual nature and the extent of the interest of the requester or of the persons for whom the requester is acting as representative in the application or tentative determination, including an explanation of how and to what extent such interest would be directly and adversely affected by the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of the permit in question; and (v) where possible, specific references to the terms and conditions of the permit in question, together with suggested revisions and alterations of those terms and conditions that the requester considers are needed to conform the permit to the intent and provisions of the basic laws of the State Air Pollution Control Board or the State Water Control Board, as applicable.

Upon completion of the public comment period on a permit action, the Director shall review all timely requests for public hearing filed during the public comment period on the permit action and within 30 calendar days following the expiration of the time period for the submission of requests shall grant a public hearing, unless the permittee or applicant agrees to a later date, if the Director finds the following: (a) that there is a significant public interest in the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of the permit in question as evidenced by receipt of a minimum of 25 individual requests for a public hearing; (b) that the requesters raise substantial, disputed issues relevant to the issuance, denial, modification, or revocation of the permit in question; and (c) that the action requested by the interested party is not on its face inconsistent with, or in violation of, the basic laws of the State Air Pollution Control Board if the permit action is an air permit action, or the basic laws of the State Water Control Board if the permit action is a water permit action, federal law, or any regulation promulgated thereunder.

The Director, shall, forthwith, notify by email or mail at his last known address (1) each requester and (2) the applicant or permittee of the decision to grant or deny a public hearing. If the request for a public hearing is granted, the Director shall schedule the hearing at a time between 45 and 75 days after emailing or mailing of the notice of the decision to grant the public hearing. The Director shall cause, or require the applicant to publish, notice of a public hearing to be published once, in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county where the facility or operation that is the subject of the permit or permit application is located, at least 30 days before the hearing date. In making its decision, the Department shall consider (A) the verbal and written comments received during the public comment period and public hearing made part of the record, (B) any commentary of the Board, and (C) the agency files. The public comment period shall remain open for 15 days after the close of the public hearing if required by §

10.1-1307.01

or § 62.1-44.15:01.

In addition, the Director may, in his discretion, convene a public hearing on a permit action.

History.

2022, c. 356.

§ 10.1-1185.
Appointment of Director; powers and duties of Director.

The Department shall be headed by a Director appointed by the Governor to serve at his pleasure. The Director shall be an experienced administrator with knowledge of environmental protection and government operation and shall have demonstrated expertise in organizational management and environmental science, environmental law, or environmental policy. The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall, under the direction and control of the Governor, exercise such power and perform such duties as are conferred or imposed upon him by law and shall perform such other duties as may be required of him by the Governor and the following Boards: the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, and the Virginia Waste Management Board. The Director or his designee shall serve as executive officer of the aforementioned Boards.

All powers and duties conferred or imposed upon the Executive Director of the Department of Air Pollution Control, the Executive Director of the State Water Control Board, the Administrator of the Council on the Environment, and the Director of the Department of Waste Management are continued and conferred or imposed upon the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or his designee. Wherever in this title and in the Code of Virginia reference is made to the head of a division, department or agency hereinafter transferred to this Department, it shall mean the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.

History.

1992, c. 887; 2008, cc. 276, 557.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2015, c. 241, cl. 1 provides: “The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall evaluate existing statutory and regulatory tools for ensuring that chemical storage in the Commonwealth is conducted in a manner that is protective of human health, public safety, drinking water resources, and the environment of the Commonwealth. This evaluation may include (i) an examination of Virginia’s existing programs to protect drinking water resources from contamination from chemical storage; (ii) identification of any existing gaps or inadequacy in drinking water protections related to chemical storage; (iii) identification of any existing gaps or inadequacy in chemical storage standards; (iv) any recommendations on chemical storage in the Commonwealth to address protection of human health, public safety, drinking water resources, the environment, and the economy of the Commonwealth; and (v) other policies and procedures that the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management determine may enhance the protection of Virginia’s drinking water resources and the safe storage of chemicals in Virginia.

“The Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, the State Health Commissioner, and the State Coordinator of Emergency Management shall report the findings of the evaluation to the State Water Commission, the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources no later than December 1, 2016.

“For purposes of this section, ‘chemical storage’ means those chemicals identified by the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act (SARA) and the Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act (EPCRA) that provides for hazardous chemical storage reporting requirements in § 312 of the SARA and are stored in excess of 10,000 gallons.”

Acts 2015, c. 241, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2017.”

Acts 2016, c. 54, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Environmental Quality be directed to seek from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) an exemption from the federal reformulated gasoline (RFG) program for the sale by a qualifying marina of conventional, ethanol-free gasoline. A qualifying marina shall be one that sells gasoline exclusively to the marine recreational or commercial trade. No ethanol-free gasoline sold by such marina shall be used in any road vehicle.”

Acts 2017, cc. 526 and 545, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Environmental Quality be directed to seek from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency an exemption from the federal reformulated gasoline program for the on-farm sale and delivery of conventional, ethanol-free gasoline for use in farm motor vehicles used exclusively for farm use as defined in § 46.2-698 of the Code of Virginia. No ethanol-free gasoline sold pursuant to such exemption shall be sold or delivered to a non-farm customer or used in any road vehicle.”

Acts 2018, c. 605, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Environmental Quality be directed to seek from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency an exemption from the federal reformulated gasoline program for the sale of conventional gasoline within that portion of the City of Hopewell that is located west of Interstate 295.”

Acts 2018, c. 632, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall suspend, delay, or defer until July 1, 2019, the issuance of any permit required to provide for the closure of any coal combustion residuals (CCRs) surface impoundment or other CCRs unit that no longer receives CCRs, located within the Chesapeake Bay watershed. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the issuance of any permit required for impoundments where CCRs have already been removed and placed in another impoundment on site, are being removed from an impoundment, or are being processed in connection with a recycling or beneficial use project.”

Acts 2018, c. 632, cl. 2 provides: “That the owner or operator of any coal combustion residuals (CCRs) surface impoundment or other CCRs unit to which the first enactment of this act applies shall by July 15, 2018, issue a request for proposals for entities to conduct recycling or beneficial use projects for the CCRs at such impoundment or unit. The request for proposals shall require responding entities to provide information from which the owner or operator is able to determine (i) the quantity of CCRs, including CCRs below the unit’s waste boundary, that may be suitable for recycling or beneficial use, including but not limited to encapsulated beneficial uses, such as bricks or concrete, in each such CCRs unit; (ii) the cost of such recycling or beneficial use of such CCRs; and (iii) the potential market demand for material recycled or beneficially used from such CCRs.”

Acts 2018, c. 632, cl. 3 provides: “That no later than November 15, 2018, the owner or operator of each coal combustion residuals (CCRs) surface impoundment or other CCRs unit to which the second enactment of this act applies shall transmit a business plan that compiles the information collected pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of such enactment to the Governor; to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Commerce and Labor, the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor (the Committees); and to the Directors of the Departments of Environmental Quality and Conservation and Recreation (the Departments). Each such owner or operator and each entity that provided the information collected pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) of the second enactment of this act shall provide assistance to the Governor, the Committees, and the Departments, upon request.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and deleted “for a term coincident with his own” at the end of the first sentence and inserted the second sentence in the first paragraph.